Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER; INTEGRATED COMMUNITY SUPPORTS CODIFICATION.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of human services must develop draft language to codify in Minnesota Statutes the standards and requirements for integrated community supports as specified in the federally approved brain injury, community access for disability inclusion, community alternative care, and developmental disabilities waiver plans. new text end new text begin (b) When developing and drafting the proposed legislative language, the commissioner must consult with stakeholders, including the Association of Residential Resources in Minnesota, the Residential Providers Association of Minnesota, the Minnesota Association of County Social Service Administrators, and people with disabilities currently or potentially receiving integrated community supports. The commissioner must ensure that the stakeholders with whom the commissioner consults represent a broad spectrum of active and potential providers and service recipients. The commissioner's consultation with stakeholders must be transparent and provide the opportunity for meaningful input from active and potential providers and service recipients. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must submit the draft legislation to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and human services policy and finance by January 1, 2026. new text end